Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2482.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XII-DNEWLY EMPLOYED TEACHER GRANT PROGRAMSection 1201-D. Scope of article.This article relates to providing a grant to newly employed teachers.Section 1202-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrative costs." Operational expenses to facilitate the implementation of section 1203-D, not to exceed Federal de minimus rate, as issued by the Office of Management and Budget."Classroom supplies." Materials, equipment and tools used to facilitate teaching and learning."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Newly employed teacher." A person who holds a valid Pennsylvania teaching certificate and has been employed by a school entity for approximately 24 months."Online e-commerce platform." A consumer interface for a vendor that can meet the requirements under section 1205-D and facilitate a commercial transaction, which shall include the transmission of funds for data or both, conducted electronically via the Internet.20260HB2482PN3354 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Program." The Newly Employed Teacher Grant Program established under section 1203-D."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 1203-D. Establishment.The Newly Employed Teacher Grant Program is established within the department to award grants to newly employed teachers who request classroom supplies to the extent that money is appropriated for this purpose.Section 1204-D. Duties of department.The department shall:(1) In accordance with 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement), select and enter into an agreement with one or more online e-commerce platforms to administer the program. An online e-commerce platform must demonstrate prior experience operating a Statewide or multidistrict program that provides direct, itemized classroom supplies with real-time public transparency prior to being selected by the department.(2) Establish a process to ensure that purchases by newly employed teachers who have been awarded a grant are restricted to online purchases of classroom supplies from department-selected online e-commerce platforms.(3) Establish a grant application in accordance with section 1206-D and issue guidelines that advise grant applicants which classroom supplies are eligible for grant funding.(4) Require annual reporting from an online e-commerce 20260HB2482PN3354 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 platform that includes the following:(i) Program utilization.(ii) Geographic distribution of funds.(iii) Timeliness of disbursements.(iv) The amount of payments received from the department for administrative costs.(v) Insights, trends and anecdotal experiences from newly employed teachers who were awarded funds about how grant funding was used in the classrooms. This data shall include the following demographics:(A) School entity information, including grade level breakdown.(B) Average poverty level in school entities where newly employed teachers received funding under the program.(C) A comparison of urban and rural school trends.(D) Amount of funds awarded to each type of school entity.Section 1205-D. Duties of online e-commerce platforms.An online e-commerce platform selected by the department shall:(1) Operate an established fiscal management and payment system that ensures that State funds are not commingled or retained for discretionary use beyond administrative costs that are permitted in accordance with the contract entered into with the department.(2) Review grant applications submitted by newly employed teachers.(3) Process and award the allocation of funds to the 20260HB2482PN3354 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 user accounts of newly employed teachers for online purchases of classroom supplies from an online e-commerce platform for grants not to exceed $500 per school year.(4) Accept donations from corporations and nonprofit organizations to provide additional funding for the program.(5) Publicly post, in a searchable and user-accessible format, project-level information, including the school entity information of the requesting teacher, purposes of funds, amount awarded and status of fulfillment, protecting personally identifiable student information.(6) Maintain a publicly accessible record of all funded program expenditures for a minimum of five years.(7) Submit an annual report to the department no later than June 15, 2027, and each June 15 thereafter.Section 1206-D. Creation and submission of application.(a) Department.--No later than May 31, 2026, the department shall:(1) Establish and publish on the department's publicly accessible Internet website the application and guidelines for the program.(2) Transmit notice of the availability of the application and guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Submission.--The online e-commerce platform shall accept applications for funding from newly employed teachers no later than July 15, 2026, and each July 15 thereafter.Section 1207-D. Classroom supplies awarded with grant funds.All classroom supplies purchased by newly employed teachers through funds awarded through the program shall become property 20260HB2482PN3354 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the school entity employing the newly employed teacher.Section 1208-D. Reports to General Assembly.No later than September 1, 2027, and each September 1 thereafter, the department shall provide a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include the following:(1) The amount of funds requested by newly employed teachers during the previous school year.(2) The amount of funds distributed to newly employed teachers during the previous school year.(3) A list of approved items purchased with grant funds during the previous school year.(4) Information reported to the department by online e-commerce platforms.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2482PN3354 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617